New York, session 2025-2026, S5665.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section
207-b to read as follows:
§ 207-b. Doula awareness and education program. 1. The department
shall conduct an ongoing public awareness and education program on
doulas and how beneficial they are to pregnancies.
2. The department shall produce and distribute educational materials
on the benefits of having a doula; a trained professional who provides
emotional, physical, and enlightening support during pregnancy, deliv-
ery, and birth. Such materials shall be made to available appropriate
health care providers for distribution to patients. On its website, the
department shall also publish information about the advantages of doulas
in reducing mortality rates for pregnant individuals and the increased
risk of this occurring for pregnant individuals who are primarily Black.
3. No provision of this section shall be deemed to prohibit the utili-
zation and distribution of educational materials relating thereto
produced by any public, private or governmental entity, in lieu of the
department's production of such materials.
4. The department shall periodically review available data on the
mortality rate of pregnant individuals in relation to doulas and update
the information provided in its educational materials and on its inter-
net website, as appropriate.
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD10386-02-6

S. 5665--A 2
5. The department shall report every three years, commencing April
first, two thousand thirty, to the governor, the temporary president of
the senate and the speaker of the assembly on the implementation of this
section and any recommendations for furthering the purposes of this
section.
§ 2. This act shall take effect April 1, 2027.